Maine, session 132, LD2121.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §90-J is enacted to read:
§90-J. Information privacy
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Authorized person" means a covered person or any of the following persons
authorized to submit or revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of a home
address on behalf of a covered person:
(1) On behalf of any federal judge, a designee of the United States Department of
Justice, United States Marshals Service or of the clerk of any United States District
Court, as long as the designee submits the affirmation required under this section
signed by the federal judge for whom a request or revocation is made;
(2) On behalf of any covered person who is deceased or medically or
psychologically incapacitated, a person acting on behalf of the covered person as
a designated trustee, as an estate executor or personal representative or pursuant to
a written power of attorney or other legal instrument, as long as the person signs
and submits the affirmation required under this section on behalf of the covered
person; and
(3) On behalf of any immediate family member who is a minor and who is
otherwise entitled to address redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to this section,
the parent or legal guardian of that minor.
B. "Covered person" means an active, formerly active or retired judicial officer,
member of Congress, state Legislator, Attorney General, Secretary of State, Treasurer
of State or State Auditor and an immediate family member.
C. "Director" means the director of the Office of Information Privacy.
D. "Immediate family member" means a spouse, child or parent of, or any other family
member related by blood or by law to, an active, formerly active or retired judicial
officer, member of Congress, state Legislator, Attorney General, Secretary of State,
Treasurer of State or State Auditor and who resides in the same household as that
person.
E. "Office" means the Office of Information Privacy established in subsection 2.
2. Office of Information Privacy; director. The Office of Information Privacy is
established in the Department of the Secretary of State. The office is led by a director, who
must be appointed by and serves at the pleasure of the Secretary of State and who may hire
staff as necessary.
A. The director shall establish:
(1) A secure electronic portal through which an authorized person may submit or
revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of a covered person's home
address from certain records and publicly available online resources, as provided
in this section. Such a request is not subject to disclosure under any statute or rule
governing disclosure of public information;
Page 1 - 132LR2650(01)

(2) A process by which an authorized person may petition the director for
reconsideration of a denial of a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of a
covered person's home address or revocation of such a request under subparagraph
(1);
(3) A process by which a person or entity may request a record that does not
contain a redaction or a nondisclosure; and
(4) A process for the evaluation of any exceptions other than those under this
paragraph to the requirement for redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to this
section, whether categorical or individualized. The director may grant an exception
to any person or entity for the receipt of the unredacted records or information
pursuant to this process.
B. The director shall evaluate and either approve or deny a request submitted pursuant
to paragraph A or a revocation of a request submitted pursuant to paragraph A.
C. The director may enter into any agreement or contract necessary to effectuate the
purposes of this section.
D. The director may issue any guidance, guidelines or decisions or adopt rules
necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section in accordance with the provisions
of the Maine Administrative Procedure Act. Rules adopted pursuant to this paragraph
are routine technical rules as described in chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
3. Information redaction, nondisclosure request; enforcement. An authorized
person seeking the redaction or nondisclosure of the home address of any covered person
from certain records and publicly available online resources shall submit a request in
accordance with this section to the office through the secure electronic portal established
under subsection 2, paragraph A. The address is subject to redaction or nondisclosure only
if a request is submitted to and approved by the director.
A. A state, county or municipal government, or a department or agency of a state,
county or municipal government, shall redact or cease to disclose, respectively, the
home address of a covered person approved by the office not later than 30 days
following the approval. A state, county or municipal government, or a department or
agency of a state, county or municipal government, also shall discontinue the redaction
or nondisclosure of the home address of any covered person for whom a revocation
request has been approved not later than 30 days following the revocation approval.
B. A custodian of records of a government, department or agency listed in paragraph
A who makes a reasonable effort to comply with this subsection must be presumed to
have acted without willful, purposeful or reckless disregard of the law.
C. An immediate family member who sought and received approval for redaction or
nondisclosure and who no longer resides with the covered person shall submit through
the portal a revocation request not later than 30 days from the date on which the
immediate family member no longer resided with the covered person.
D. An authorized person submitting a request for redaction or nondisclosure pursuant
to this subsection shall affirm in writing that the covered person understands that
certain rights, duties and obligations are affected because of the request, including:
Page 2 - 132LR2650(01)

(1) The signing of petitions related to the nomination or election of a candidate to
public office or related to any public question;
(2) The eligibility or requirements related to seeking or accepting the nomination
for election or election to public office, or the appointment to any public position;
(3) The sale or purchase of a home or other property, recordation of a judgment,
lien or other encumbrance on real or other property and any relief granted based
on the sale or purchase of a home or other property or recordation of a judgment,
lien or other encumbrance on real or other property;
(4) The ability to be notified of any class action suit or settlement; and
(5) Any other legal, promotional or official notice that would otherwise be
provided to the person but for the redaction or nondisclosure of the person's home
address pursuant to this subsection.
4. Exceptions. The following exceptions apply to the requirement to redact, and the
prohibition against the disclosure of, a home address pursuant to subsection 3.
A. Copies of voter registration files maintained in the central voter registration system
as defined in Title 21-A, section 1, subsection 6-A must be provided as redacted
pursuant to this section, but copies of the files as unredacted must be provided to the
following individuals, upon the individual's signing of an affidavit attesting to the
individual's qualifying status:
(1) The chair of the state, county or municipal committee of a political party, or a
designee of the chair, for distribution to any person authorized to serve as a
challenger in an election;
(2) A candidate acting as a challenger in an election;
(3) A vendor, contractor or organization carrying out a function of a municipality
or county or of the State concerning the administration or conduct of elections; and
(4) A person who has the right to obtain a copy of voter registration files pursuant
to an order of a Justice of the Superior Court after a finding that the unredacted
copy is necessary to determine the merits of a pending case.
B. Except as provided in paragraph C, subparagraph (3), a document affecting the title
to real property, recorded and indexed by a register of deeds or as otherwise held or
maintained by the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of
Revenue Services, a county board of commissioners, a county official responsible for
tax administration or a county or municipal tax assessor, that contains a home address
subject to redaction or nondisclosure consistent with this section may instead or in
addition include the redaction and nondisclosure of the names or other information of
covered persons, as specified by the State Tax Assessor. The redaction and
nondisclosure may include masking of the covered person's names or other
information, and the document must be provided as unredacted to the following
persons when requested in the person's ordinary course of business:
(1) A title insurance company, a title insurance agent or an attorney;
(2) A mortgage guarantee insurance company;
(3) A mortgage loan originator;
Page 3 - 132LR2650(01)

(4) An entity that performs title searches;
(5) A real estate broker or a real estate salesperson; and
(6) An individual or business that has made or received an offer for the purchase
of real estate or real property, or any portion of real estate or real property, to or
from a covered person.
C. The following are not subject to redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to subsection
3:
(1) Records and documents, including Uniform Commercial Code filings and
financing statements, maintained by the Department of the Secretary of State,
bureau of corporations, elections and commissions, division of corporations,
uniform commercial code and commissions;
(2) Petitions naming candidates for office;
(3) Records evidencing any lien, judgment or other encumbrance upon real or
other property; and
(4) Records pertaining to property that is presumed abandoned under the Maine
Revised Unclaimed Property Act.
D. A public agency may share unredacted information with a vendor, contractor or
organization to carry out the purposes for which the public agency entered into an
agreement with the vendor, contractor or organization. The vendor, contractor or
organization may not use such information in any manner other than as necessary to
carry out the purposes of the agreement.
E. For the purposes of the calculation of property tax benefits and the administration
of property tax credits for covered persons, a municipality may share unredacted
property tax information with the State Tax Assessor, and the State Tax Assessor may
provide to a municipality the property tax credits to be applied against property tax
bills of covered persons who are eligible claimants.
5. Information shared with governmental entity. This section may not be construed
to require redaction or nondisclosure of any information in any document, record or
database shared with or otherwise provided to any other governmental entity.
6. Register of deeds returning document. This section may not be construed to
prohibit a register of deeds from returning a document as unredacted to any person who
submitted the document for recordation.
7. Information provided upon court order. Information otherwise subject to
redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to this section may be provided as unredacted upon
order of a Justice of the Superior Court or of any other court of competent jurisdiction.
8. Availability of records. This section may not be construed to require a record to
be made available that is not otherwise required to be made available under any other law
or rule.
9. State Tax Assessor may issue guidance or adopt rules. The State Tax Assessor
may issue any guidance or guidelines or adopt rules necessary to effectuate the purposes of
this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as
described in chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Page 4 - 132LR2650(01)